California, session 20252026, AB1636.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to place students at the center of the enrollment experience by exploring innovative approaches that remove barriers to college access and ease the transition from high school into higher education through earlier connections to counseling, financial aid, orientation, and other student support services.(b) The purpose of the prototype established by this act is to evaluate a streamlined process for creating a community college student record using information already available through existing educational partnerships with informed consent of the participating students, and when required, their parents or guardians.(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that findings, recommendations, and lessons learned from the prototype inform the continuing development of statewide California Community Colleges application and enrollment processing.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 76005 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 76004, to read:76005. (a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(2) “District” means the Cerritos Community College District.(3) “Partnering local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school that meets both of the following:(A) Has a partnership with the district as authorized under Section 76004 or 76396.2.(B) Is geographically located within the service area of the district.(b) (1) (A) On or before September April 1, 2027, the district, in consultation with the chancellor’s office, in collaboration with the district, shall develop a method recommended prototype for the district to compile and transmit personally identifiable student information to the chancellor’s office for the limited and express purpose of creating a community college student record for course enrollment at the California Community Colleges.(B) The method recommended prototype described in subparagraph (A) shall require describe how the district to will compile and transmit the personally identifiable student information to the chancellor’s office in a manner that complies with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.(C) The method recommended prototype described in subparagraph (A) may identify and use existing system capabilities used to create a community college student record.(D) In developing the method recommended prototype described in subparagraph (A), the chancellor’s office district, in consultation with the chancellor’s office, shall identify the minimum amount of personally identifiable student information that is required to be compiled and transmitted by the district to create a community college student record for course enrollment at the California Community Colleges, and make recommendations on how the data should be collected, transmitted, and stored to best protect student data and adhere to data privacy standards.(2) On or before September 1, 2027, the chancellor’s office, in collaboration with the department, as needed, shall develop a form that will be used The district, in consultation with the chancellor’s office and the department, shall include a proposed form or process as part of the recommended prototype to obtain informed consent from participating students. students, and when required by law, a parent or guardian. The form or process shall contain, include, but is not limited to, the following information:(A) A description of the program, including its status as a pilot and its purpose as an application process specifically for community colleges.(B) How the pilot application process differs from CCCApply. CCCApply and CCCStart.(C) How student data will be handled at all stages of the process, including acquisition, transmission, and storage.(c) (1) On or before September 1, 2027, the chancellor’s office shall review and approve the district’s recommended prototype developed pursuant to subdivision (b).(2) The chancellor’s office review described in paragraph (1) shall determine whether the district’s recommended prototype is consistent with this section and complies with applicable state and federal privacy, data security, data minimization, and technical transmission requirements. (3) The chancellor’s office shall approve the district’s recommended prototype unless the chancellor’s office determines, based on specific written findings, that a specific element of the recommended prototype is inconsistent with this section or cannot be implemented due to an identified legal or technical deficiency.(4) If the chancellor’s office does not approve the recommended prototype, the district may submit a revised recommended prototype addressing the identified deficiencies, and the chancellor’s office shall complete review and approval of the revised recommended prototype on or before September 1, 2027.(c)(d) (1) Upon implementation of the method developed approval by the chancellor’s office of the recommended prototype pursuant to subdivision						(b), (c), the governing board of the district may enter into a data-sharing agreement with the governing board of a partnering local educational agency to exchange personally identifiable student information described in subdivision (b) for the limited and express purpose of creating a community college student record for course enrollment at the California Community Colleges.(2) The personally identifiable student information exchanged under a data-sharing agreement described in paragraph (1) shall be compiled and transmitted by the district to the chancellor’s office under the method recommended prototype developed pursuant to subdivision (b).(3) The personally identifiable student information exchanged under a data-sharing agreement described in paragraph (1) shall only be used by the district and the chancellor’s office for the limited and express purpose of creating a community college student record for course enrollment at the California Community Colleges.(4) A data-sharing agreement described in paragraph (1) shall include a requirement for the local educational agency to obtain the express written consent of either the student, if the student is 18 years of age or older, or the student’s parent or guardian to exchange the personally identifiable student information under the method recommended prototype developed pursuant to subdivision (b) with the district and the chancellor’s office for the limited and express purpose of creating a community college student record for course enrollment at the California Community Colleges.(5) Personally identifiable student information shared by the local educational agency with the district under a data-sharing agreement described in paragraph (1) shall be limited to the data identified by the chancellor’s office pursuant to subdivision (b), and shall be shared by the local educational agency with the district in a manner that complies with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.(d)(e) Upon receiving personally identifiable student information from a partnering local educational agency under a data-sharing agreement described in subdivision (c), (d), the district shall compile and transmit the information to the chancellor’s office under the method recommended prototype developed pursuant to subdivision (b), to create a community college student record for the limited and express purpose of creating a community college student record for course enrollment at the California Community Colleges.(e)(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2031, the district, in collaboration consultation with the chancellor’s office, shall submit a report to the Legislature on the effectiveness of this section in accomplishing the purpose of providing seamless enrollment of participating students of a partnering local educational agency in courses offered by the district.(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.(f)(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances concerning the Cerritos Community College District, in that it serves a uniquely concentrated population of first-generation college students, operates an integrated college-going partnership with all high schools maintained by the district, and has developed a comprehensive onboarding and student success framework that enables the implementation and evaluation of an automatic registration pilot program in a manner not currently feasible statewide.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.